Missouri, session 2026, SB846.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
eight new sections, to be known as sections 376.411, 376.415,
376.416, 376.2100, 376.2102, 376.2104, 376.2106, and 376.2108,
to read as follows:
376.411. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Clinician-administered drug", any legend drug, as
defined in section 338.330, that is administered by a health
care provider who is authorized to administer the drug;
(2) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(3) "Participating provider", the same meaning given
to the term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Pharmacy benefits manager", the same meaning
given to the term in section 376.388.
2. A health carrier, a pharmacy benefits manager, or
an agent or affiliate of such health carrier or pharmacy
benefits manager shall not:
(1) Impose any penalty, impediment, differentiation,
or limitation on a participating provider for providing

SB 846 2
medically necessary clinician-administered drugs regardless
of whether the participating provider obtains such drugs
from a provider that is in the network including, but not
limited to, refusing to approve or pay or reimbursing less
than the contracted payment amount;
(2) Impose any penalty, impediment, differentiation,
or limitation on a covered person who is administered
medically necessary clinician-administered drugs regardless
of whether the participating provider obtains such drugs
from a provider that is in the network including, but not
limited to, limiting coverage or benefits; requiring an
additional fee, higher co-payment, or higher coinsurance
amount; or interfering with a patient's ability to obtain a
clinician-administered drug from the patient's provider or
pharmacy of choice by any means including, but not limited
to, inducing, steering, or offering financial or other
incentives; or
(3) Impose any penalty, impediment, differentiation,
or limitation on any pharmacy, including any class B
hospital pharmacy as defined in section 338.220, that is
dispensing medically necessary clinician-administered drugs
regardless of whether the participating provider obtains
such drugs from a provider that is in the network including,
but not limited to, requiring a pharmacy to dispense such
drugs to a patient with the intention that the patient will
transport the medication to a health care provider for
administration.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply if
the clinician-administered drug is not otherwise covered by
the health carrier or pharmacy benefits manager.
376.415. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:

SB 846 3
(1) "Biological product", the same meaning given to
the term in 42 U.S.C. Section 262(i);
(2) "Biosimilar", the same meaning given to the term
in 42 U.S.C. Section 262(i);
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Pharmacy benefits manager", the same meaning
given to the term in section 376.388;
(5) "Reference product", the same meaning given to the
term in 42 U.S.C. Section 262(i).
2. A health carrier, a pharmacy benefits manager, or
an agent or affiliate of such health carrier or pharmacy
benefits manager that provides coverage for a reference
product or a biological product that is biosimilar to the
reference product shall provide coverage for the reference
product and all biological products that have been deemed
biosimilar to the reference product. The scope, extent, and
amount of such required coverage shall be the same
including, but not limited to, any payment limitations or
cost-sharing obligations.
376.416. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "340B drug", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.414;
(2) "Covered entity", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.414;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Pharmacy", an entity licensed under chapter 338;
(5) "Pharmacy benefits manager", the same meaning
given to the term in section 376.388;

SB 846 4
2. A health carrier, a pharmacy benefits manager, or
an agent or affiliate of such health carrier or pharmacy
benefits manager shall not discriminate against a covered
entity or a pharmacy including, but not limited to, by doing
any of the following:
(1) Reimbursing a covered entity or pharmacy for a
quantity of a 340B drug in an amount less than it would pay
to any other similarly situated pharmacy that is not a
covered entity or a pharmacy for such quantity of such drug
on the basis that the entity or pharmacy is a covered entity
or pharmacy or that the entity or pharmacy dispenses 340B
drugs;
(2) Imposing any terms or conditions on covered
entities or pharmacies that differ from such terms or
conditions applied to other similarly situated pharmacies or
entities that are not covered entities on the basis that the
entity or pharmacy is a covered entity or pharmacy or that
the entity or pharmacy dispenses 340B drugs including, but
not limited to, terms or conditions with respect to any of
the following:
(a) Fees, chargebacks, clawbacks, adjustments, or
other assessments;
(b) Professional dispensing fees;
(c) Restrictions or requirements regarding
participation in standard or preferred pharmacy networks;
(d) Requirements relating to the frequency or scope of
audits or to inventory management systems using generally
accepted accounting principles; and
(e) Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or
policies that, as specified by the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, interfere with the

SB 846 5
ability of a covered entity to maximize the value of
discounts provided under 42 U.S.C. Section 256b;
(3) Interfering with an individual's choice to receive
a 340B drug from a covered entity or pharmacy, whether in
person or via direct delivery, mail, or other form of
shipment, by any means including, but not limited to,
modifying a patient's payment limitations or cost-sharing
obligations on the basis of participation, in whole or in
part, in the 340B drug pricing program;
(4) Discriminating in reimbursement to a covered
entity or pharmacy based on the determination or indication
a drug is a 340B drug;
(5) Requiring a covered entity or pharmacy to
identify, either directly or through a third party, a 340B
drug sooner than forty-five days after the point of sale of
the 340B drug;
(6) Refusing to contract with a covered entity or
pharmacy for reasons other than those that apply equally to
entities that are not covered entities or similarly situated
pharmacies, or on the basis that:
(a) The entity is a covered entity; or
(b) The entity or pharmacy is described in any of
subparagraphs (A) to (O) of 42 U.S.C. Section 235b(a)(4);
(7) Denying the covered entity the ability to purchase
drugs at 340B program pricing by substituting a rebate
discount;
(8) Refusing to cover drugs purchased under the 340B
drug pricing program; or
(9) Requiring a covered entity or pharmacy to reverse,
resubmit, or clarify a 340B drug pricing claim after the
initial adjudication unless these actions are in the normal

SB 846 6
course of pharmacy business and not related to 340B drug
pricing, except as required by federal law.
3. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall impose a civil penalty on any health
carrier, pharmacy benefits manager, or agent or affiliate of
such health carrier or pharmacy benefits manager that
violates the requirements of this section. Such penalty
shall not exceed five thousand dollars per violation per day.
4. The director of the department of commerce and
insurance shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
376.2100. 1. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 1 of section 376.2108, as used in sections
376.2100 to 376.2108, terms shall have the same meanings as
are ascribed to them under section 376.1350.
2. As used in sections 376.2100 to 376.2108, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Evaluation period", any consecutive twelve months;
(2) "Value-based care agreement", a contractual
agreement between a health care provider, either directly or

SB 846 7
indirectly through a health care provider group or
organization, and a health carrier that:
(a) Incentivizes or rewards providers based on one or
more of the following:
a. Quality of care;
b. Safety;
c. Patient outcomes;
d. Efficiency;
e. Cost reduction; or
f. Other factors; and
(b) May, but is not required to, include shared
financial risk and rewards based on performance metrics.
376.2102. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, beginning January 1, 2027, a health carrier or
utilization review entity shall not require a health care
provider to obtain prior authorization for a health care
service unless the health carrier or utilization review
entity makes a determination that in the most recent
evaluation period the health carrier or utilization review
entity has approved or would have approved less than ninety
percent of the prior authorization requests submitted by
that provider for that health care service.
2. Beginning January 1, 2027, a health carrier or
utilization review entity shall not require a health care
provider to obtain prior authorization for any health care
services unless the health carrier or utilization review
entity makes a determination that in the most recent
evaluation period the health carrier or utilization review
entity has approved or would have approved less than ninety
percent of all prior authorization requests submitted by
that provider for health care services.

SB 846 8
3. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, a health carrier or
utilization review entity may elect to have a hospital, as
that term is defined in section 197.020, determine which of
the following conditions that such hospital will comply with
to obtain an exemption from prior authorization requirements
under subsections 1 and 2 of this section:
(a) The hospital entering into, either directly or
indirectly through a health care provider group or
organization, a value-based care agreement with the health
carrier;
(b) The hospital's score of three or higher on the
Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services Five-Star Quality
Rating System, 42 CFR Section 412.190, or its successor
rating system; or
(c) At least ninety-one percent of the hospital's
prior authorization requests submitted for purposes of
eligibility for subsections 1 or 2 of this section were
approved or would have been approved by the health carrier
or utilization review entity.
(2) Critical access hospitals and hospitals that do
not participate in the Center for Medicare and Medicaid
Services Five-Star Quality Rating System, or its successor
rating system, shall be exempt from the provisions of this
subsection.
4. The exemption from prior authorization requirements
described in subsections 1, 2, and 3 of this section shall
not include:
(1) Pharmacy services, not to exceed the amount of one
hundred thousand dollars;
(2) Imaging services, not to exceed the amount of one
hundred thousand dollars;

SB 846 9
(3) Cosmetic procedures that are not medically
necessary; or
(4) Investigative or experimental treatments.
5. The amount of the limitations described in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 4 of this section
shall be increased every year, rounded to the nearest
thousand dollars, beginning January 1, 2028, based on the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the United
States (CPI-U), or its successor index, as such index is
defined and officially reported by the United States
Department of Labor, or its successor agency.
6. In making a determination under this section, the
health carrier or utilization review entity shall not count:
(1) Any prior authorization requests denied by a
health carrier or utilization review entity and being
appealed by the health care provider; or
(2) Any request made by a health care provider for a
service that is not included in the health carrier's benefit
plan but shall count as approved any prior authorization
request that was denied by a health carrier or utilization
review entity but that was subsequently authorized.
7. In making a determination under this section, the
health carrier or utilization review entity shall use either
the provider's national provider identifier or a taxpayer
identification number. Such designation shall remain unless
requested to be changed by the provider.
8. The exemption from prior authorization requirements
described in subsections 1, 2, and 3 of this section may be
subject to internal auditing of the most recent consecutive
six months, up to a maximum of two times per year, by the
health carrier or utilization review entity and may be
rescinded if:

SB 846 10
(1) Such carrier or utilization review entity
determines that the carrier or utilization review entity
would have approved less than ninety percent of prior
authorization requests for a health care service that the
provider was exempt from the prior authorization requirement
under subsection 1 of this section;
(2) Such carrier or utilization review entity
determines that the carrier or utilization review entity
would have approved less than ninety percent of all prior
authorization requests if the provider was exempt from the
prior authorization requirement under subsection 2 of this
section; or
(3) There has been an increase in the provision of
exempt procedures by a health care provider of more than
fifty percent or more than twenty procedures, whichever
amount is greater.
9. The exemption described in subsections 1, 2, and 3
100 of this section shall be null and void upon a determination
101 that the health care provider has been found by a court of
102 law to have civilly or criminally engaged in any fraud or
103 abuse after the exemption is granted by a health carrier or
104 utilization review entity.
105 10. A health carrier or utilization review entity may
106 require health care providers in the health carrier's or
107 utilization review entity's network to use an online portal
108 to submit requests for prior authorization.
109 11. No adverse determination shall be finalized under
110 subsections 1, 2, 3, or 8 unless reviewed by a clinical peer.
111 12. Any patient who has received prior authorization
112 for the coverage of a ninety-day supply of medication whose
113 health coverage plan changes following such authorization
114 shall be permitted a ninety-day grace period from the date

SB 846 11
115 of such change in order to determine whether such patient's
116 new plan covers the previously authorized medication or
117 whether prior authorization is required.
376.2104. 1. The health carrier or utilization review
entity shall notify the health care provider no later than
twenty-five days after any determination made under section
376.2102. The notification shall include the statistics,
data, and any supporting documentation for making the
determination for the relevant evaluation period.
2. The health carrier or utilization review entity
shall establish a process for health care providers to
appeal any determinations made under section 376.2102.
3. The health carrier or utilization review entity
shall maintain an online portal to allow health care
providers to access all prior authorization decisions,
including determinations made under section 376.2102. For
health care providers subject to prior authorizations, the
portal shall include the status of each prior authorization
request, all notifications to the health care provider, the
dates the health care provider received such notifications,
and any other information relevant to the determination.
376.2106. No health carrier or utilization review
entity shall deny or reduce payment to a health care
provider for a health care service for which the provider
has a prior authorization unless the provider:
(1) Knowingly and materially misrepresented the health
care service in a request for payment submitted to the
health carrier or utilization review entity with the
specific intent to deceive and obtain an unlawful payment
from the carrier or entity; or
(2) Failed to substantially perform the health care
service.

SB 846 12
376.2108. 1. The provisions of sections 376.2100 to
376.2108 shall not apply to MO HealthNet, except that a
Medicaid managed care organization as defined in section
208.431 shall be considered a health carrier for purposes of
sections 376.2100 to 376.2108.
2. The provisions of sections 376.2100 to 376.2108
shall not apply to health care providers who have not
participated in a health benefit plan offered by the health
carrier for at least one full evaluation period.
3. Nothing in sections 376.2100 to 376.2108 shall be
construed to:
(1) Authorize a health care provider to provide a
health care service outside the scope of his or her
applicable license; or
(2) Require a health carrier or utilization review
entity to pay for a health care service described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
✓